Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2638
Repealed. Laws 2003, LB 46, § 55.

Laws 2003, LB 46, section 51, provided this section became operative "when thirty-five states have adopted the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision". By June 2002, the compact had reached this threshold. (See www.interstatecompact.org.) LB 46 became effective May 24, 2003.